District of Columbia statutes.
47-2884.14

Sale of pawn or pledge—Notice.

At least 30 days before selling a pawn or a pledge, the pawnbroker shall send notice of the sale to the pawner by certified mail. Certificates of mailing of the notice shall be part of the pawnbroker business records required by this part to be kept.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1042, ch. 970, § 14
Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-137,§ 2(b), 31 DCR 5743
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1914.
1973 Ed., § 2-2014.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.